Utah statutes.
38-1-27.2.   Notice to subcontractor.
(1)  As used in this section, "project" means a project or improvement for
which a preliminary notice has been filed pursuant to Section 38-1-32.
(2)  If a subcontractor requests a notice described in this section, an
original contractor shall provide notice:
(a)  to the subcontractor who requests the notice described in this section;
(b)  within 14 calendar days after the day on which the subcontractor requests
the notice described in this section; and
(c)  informing the subcontractor of each preliminary notice the original
contractor has received for the project.
